Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 7
VOTING MACHINES

1-13.5-701. Use of voting machines.

Voting machines may be used in any local government election if the governing body, by resolution, authorizes their use.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 29, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-702. Judges to inspect machines - when.

The election judges of each polling place at which voting machines are used shall meet at the polling place at least forty-five minutes before the time set for the opening of the polls at each election. Before the polls open for an election, each judge shall carefully examine each machine used in the polling place and see that no vote has been cast and that every counter, except the protective counter, registers zero.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 29, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-703. Sample ballots, ballot labels, and instruction cards.

Sample ballots must be produced for display at polling places in which voting machines are used and are subject to public inspection. The sample ballots must be arranged in the form of a diagram showing the front of the voting machine as it will appear after the official ballot labels are arranged on the voting machine for voting. The designated election official shall provide sample ballots for each polling place. The sample ballots must be delivered to the election judges and posted in the polling place for display on election day.

The designated election official or his or her designee shall also prepare and place on each voting machine to be used in the polling place a set of official ballot labels arranged in the manner prescribed for the official election ballot to be used on voting machines. The designated election official shall deliver the required number of voting machines, equipped with the official ballot, to each polling place no later than the day prior to the day of election.

Instruction cards to guide eligible electors in casting their ballots on voting machines must be supplied by the designated election official as provided in section 1-13.5-906.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 30, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-704. Instructions to vote.

In case an eligible elector, after entering the voting machine or voting booth, asks for further instructions concerning the manner of voting, an election judge shall give such instruction to him or her; except that no judge or other election officer or person assisting such elector shall enter the voting machine or voting booth, except as provided in section 1-13.5-607, or in any manner request, suggest, or seek to persuade or induce any such elector to vote for any particular candidate, or for or against any particular ballot issue or ballot question. After receiving instruction, the eligible elector shall vote as in the case of an unassisted voter.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 30, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-705. Length of time to vote.

No eligible elector shall remain within the voting machine booth longer than three minutes. If an eligible elector refuses to leave after a lapse of three minutes, the elector shall be removed by the election judges, but the judges, in their discretion, may permit an elector to remain longer than three minutes.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 30, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-706. Judge to watch voting machines.

The election judges shall designate at least one judge to be stationed beside the entrance to the voting machine or voting booth during the entire period of the election to see that it is properly closed after an elector has entered to vote. At such intervals as the judge deems proper or necessary, the judge shall examine the face of the machine to ascertain whether it has been defaced or injured, to detect the wrongdoer, and to repair any injury.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 30, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-707. Designated election official to supply seals for voting machines.

The designated election official shall supply each polling place with a seal for each voting machine for the purpose of sealing each machine after the polls are closed and an envelope for the return of the keys and seals to the machine, as applicable, with the election returns.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 31, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-708. Close of polls and count of votes.

As soon as the polls are closed, the election judges shall immediately lock and seal each voting machine to prevent further voting. Immediately after each machine is locked and sealed, the election judges shall open the counting compartments and count the votes. After the total votes for each candidate and each ballot issue or ballot question, as applicable, have been ascertained, the election judges shall make a certificate of votes cast, in numerical figures only, and return the same to the designated election official as provided in section 1-13.5-613.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 31, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-709. Election laws apply - separate absentee ballots permitted.

Nothing in this part 7 prohibits the use and acceptance of separate paper ballots by absentee voters.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 31, § 6, effective February 18.